Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,125
Bonds issued to discharge judgments or procure surrender of bonds, notes, and warrants; contracts; duties of public officers.

After the making of a contract and the issuance of bonds as herein authorized in sections 46-1,114 to 46-1,126, it shall be the duty of all district and county officials, and such officials are hereby authorized and directed, to do and perform all such acts and things within the powers of their respective offices as may be necessary or convenient to cause the district to carry out and fully perform the obligations of such contract and bonds, including, among other things not specified, the levying and collecting of taxes, the disposition of the money of the district, the application and transfer of funds, the borrowing of money, and the payment of bonds and other obligations. In the absence of any provision of law specifying the officer by which and the manner in which any act or thing required by any such contract shall be done or performed the board of directors shall have full power and authority to determine the matter.

Laws 1925, c. 128, § 12, p. 340;

C.S.1929, § 46-189;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,125.